New York, session 2025-2026, S7514.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 15 and 16 of section 2611 of the public 2 authorities law, subdivision 15 as amended by section 3 of part C of 3 chapter 60 of the laws of 2012 and subdivision 16 as added by chapter 4 404 of the laws of 1981 and as renumbered by chapter 38 of the laws of 5 1987, are amended to read as follows: 6 15. To procure insurance against any loss or liability in connection 7 with the use, management, maintenance and operation of the participating 8 olympic facilities and/or Belleayre Mountain ski center, in such amounts 9 and from such insurers, subject to public bidding as it deems desirable; 10 [and] 11 16. To develop, in consultation with the department of environmental 12 conservation and the division of human rights, an anti-bias and inclu- 13 sion training program for all employees of the Olympic regional develop- 14 ment authority, the department of environmental conservation, and all 15 private contractors working for the state at such agencies, working in 16 tourist accommodations or tourist attractions in Adirondack park. 17 (a) For purposes of this subdivision the following terms shall have 18 the following meanings ascribed to them: 19 (i) The term "Adirondack park" shall mean land lying within the area 20 described in subdivision one of section 9-0101 of the environmental 21 conservation law including any future amendments thereto. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08198-01-5 S. 7514 2 1 (ii) The term "tourist accommodation" shall mean any hotel, motel, 2 resort, tourist cabin, state-owned campground or campsite, or similar 3 facility designed to house the general public. 4 (iii) The term "tourist attraction" shall mean (i) any human-made or 5 natural place of interest open to the general public for which admit- 6 tance fee is usually charged, including but not limited to animal farms, 7 amusement parks, replicas of real or fictional places, things or people 8 and natural geological formations; and (ii) any natural attraction for 9 which no admittance fee is charged, including but not limited to, the 10 forest preserve lands. 11 (b) All employees and private contractors described in this subdivi- 12 sion shall complete a minimum of thirty minutes of such anti-bias and 13 inclusion training program annually. 14 (c) Such anti-bias and inclusion training program shall include, but 15 shall not be limited to: (i) general discussions about diversity and 16 bias, including unconscious bias; (ii) tools to create an inclusive and 17 respectful work environment; (iii) examination of employee's own 18 personal biases; and (iv) identification of ways to respond to discrimi- 19 nation and bias. 20 (d) The division of human rights may promulgate rules and regulations 21 as necessary for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this 22 subdivision; and 23 17. To do all things necessary, convenient or desirable to carry out 24 its purposes and for the exercise of the powers granted in this title. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 26 have become a law.